test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_V_IMPER_niimi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  VAI - V - niimi - IMPER :

  #Template Key
  #1
  #imperative

     #Isolation form
     niimi: niimi
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     niimi+Imm21: niimidaa
     niimi+Imm2Pl: niimig
     niimi+Imm2Sg: niimin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     niimi+Del2Pl: niimikag
     niimi+Del2Sg: niimikan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     niimi+Prob21: niimisiidaa
     niimi+Prob2Pl: niimikegon
     niimi+Prob2Sg: niimiken
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     niimi+Imm21+Del2Pl: niimidaakag
     niimi+Imm21+Del2Sg: niimidaakan
     niimi+Imm2Pl+Del2Pl: niimigkag
     niimi+Imm2Pl+Del2Sg: niimigkan
     niimi+Imm2Sg+Del2Pl: niiminkag
     niimi+Imm2Sg+Del2Sg: niiminkan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     niimi+Imm21+Prob21: niimidaasiidaa
     niimi+Imm21+Prob2Pl: niimidaakegon
     niimi+Imm21+Prob2Sg: niimidaaken
     niimi+Imm2Pl+Prob21: niimigsiidaa
     niimi+Imm2Pl+Prob2Pl: niimigkegon
     niimi+Imm2Pl+Prob2Sg: niimigken
     niimi+Imm2Sg+Prob21: niiminsiidaa
     niimi+Imm2Sg+Prob2Pl: niiminkegon
     niimi+Imm2Sg+Prob2Sg: niiminken
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     niimi+Del2Pl+Prob21: niimikagsiidaa
     niimi+Del2Pl+Prob2Pl: niimikagkegon
     niimi+Del2Pl+Prob2Sg: niimikagken
     niimi+Del2Sg+Prob21: niimikansiidaa
     niimi+Del2Sg+Prob2Pl: niimikankegon
     niimi+Del2Sg+Prob2Sg: niimikanken
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     niimi+Imm21+Del2Pl+Prob21: niimidaakagsiidaa
     niimi+Imm21+Del2Pl+Prob2Pl: niimidaakagkegon
     niimi+Imm21+Del2Pl+Prob2Sg: niimidaakagken
     niimi+Imm21+Del2Sg+Prob21: niimidaakansiidaa
     niimi+Imm21+Del2Sg+Prob2Pl: niimidaakankegon
     niimi+Imm21+Del2Sg+Prob2Sg: niimidaakanken
     niimi+Imm2Pl+Del2Pl+Prob21: niimigkagsiidaa
     niimi+Imm2Pl+Del2Pl+Prob2Pl: niimigkagkegon
     niimi+Imm2Pl+Del2Pl+Prob2Sg: niimigkagken
     niimi+Imm2Pl+Del2Sg+Prob21: niimigkansiidaa
     niimi+Imm2Pl+Del2Sg+Prob2Pl: niimigkankegon
     niimi+Imm2Pl+Del2Sg+Prob2Sg: niimigkanken
     niimi+Imm2Sg+Del2Pl+Prob21: niiminkagsiidaa
     niimi+Imm2Sg+Del2Pl+Prob2Pl: niiminkagkegon
     niimi+Imm2Sg+Del2Pl+Prob2Sg: niiminkagken
     niimi+Imm2Sg+Del2Sg+Prob21: niiminkansiidaa
     niimi+Imm2Sg+Del2Sg+Prob2Pl: niiminkankegon
     niimi+Imm2Sg+Del2Sg+Prob2Sg: niiminkanken
     
